Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2130.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5396YH (4) 91 th/ns H.F. 2130 Section 1. Section 321J.20, subsections 3 and 7, Code 2026, 1 are amended to read as follows: 2 3. In addition to other penalties provided by law, a 3 personâs temporary restricted license shall be revoked if 4 the person A person who is required to install an ignition 5 interlock device and the person under this chapter commits a 6 simple misdemeanor when the person operates a motor vehicle 7 which that does not have an approved ignition interlock device 8 or removes the ignition interlock device without authorization 9 installed . In addition, the department shall revoke the 10 personâs temporary restricted license. 11 7. A person who tampers with, removes without 12 authorization, or circumvents an ignition interlock device 13 installed as required in this chapter while the requirement for 14 the ignition interlock device is in effect commits a serious 15 misdemeanor. In addition, the department shall revoke the 16 personâs temporary restricted license. 17